Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1378
Department; power to require permits and records.

In adopting and promulgating rules and regulations governing the handling of brucellosis infected or exposed animals, or animals reasonably suspected of being infected or exposed, the department may require persons to obtain permits from the department prior to engaging in designated activities. Such persons may also be required to maintain necessary records in conjunction with such activities or to file reports with the department.

Laws 1983, LB 573, § 12.